New York, session 2025-2026, A6005.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The penal law is amended by adding a new section 190.90 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 190.90 Spoofing a police agency telephone number in the second degree. 4 A person is guilty of spoofing a police agency telephone number in the 5 second degree when, with intent to defraud another person or to harass, 6 annoy, threaten, or alarm another person, such person places a telephone 7 call whereby the ID display of the person receiving the call displays a 8 phone number of a police agency of this state or any political subdivi- 9 sion of this state or displays any other information that would indicate 10 that such phone call was placed by a police agency of this state or any 11 political subdivision of this state. 12 Spoofing a police agency telephone number in the second degree is a 13 class A misdemeanor. 14 § 2. The penal law is amended by adding a new section 190.95 to read 15 as follows: 16 § 190.95 Spoofing a police agency telephone number in the first degree. 17 A person is guilty of spoofing a police agency telephone number in the 18 first degree when such person commits the crime of spoofing a police 19 agency telephone number in the second degree and such person has been 20 previously convicted within the last ten years of spoofing a police 21 agency telephone number in the second degree or spoofing a police agency 22 telephone number in the first degree. 23 Spoofing a police agency telephone number in the first degree is a 24 class E felony. 25 § 3. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 26 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07953-01-5